District of Columbia statutes.
38-1204.02

Advisory committees.

The Trustees shall appoint such advisory committees as are necessary to advise on educational policy. Such advisory committees may consist of members of the Trustees, students, faculty members, parents, and governmental, educational, business, industrial, labor, and community representatives.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1429, Pub. L. 93-471, title IV, § 402
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 5, 22 DCR 2931
1973 Ed., § 31-1732.
1981 Ed., § 31-1532.